Washington statutes.
RCW 1.20.010

State flag.

The official flag of the state of Washington shall be of dark green silk or bunting and shall bear in its center a reproduction of the seal of the state of Washington embroidered, printed, painted or stamped thereon. The edges of the flag may, or may not, be fringed. If a fringe is used the same shall be of gold or yellow color of the same shade as the seal. The dimensions of the flag may vary.

The secretary of state is authorized to provide the state flag to units of the armed forces, without charge therefor, as in his or her discretion he or she deems entitled thereto. The secretary of state is further authorized to sell the state flag to any citizen at a price to be determined by the secretary of state.

[ 2011 c 336 s 7; 1967 ex.s. c 65 s 2; 1925 ex.s. c 85 s 1; 1923 c 174 s 1; RRS s 10964-1, RRS vol. 11, p. 399.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: Same RRS number was also used for a section dealing with a different subject on page 110 of RRS vol. 11, pocket part.